Utah statutes.
58-70a-304.   License renewal -- Continuing education.
(1)  Prior to license renewal, each licensee shall, during each two-year
licensure cycle or other cycle defined by division rule, complete qualified
continuing professional education requirements as defined by division rule
made in collaboration with the board.
(2)  If a renewal period is extended or shortened under Section 58-70a-303,
the continuing education hours required for license renewal under this section
are increased or decreased proportionally.
